Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 10. Verified Report of Property - Examination of Records

38-13-1001.
Verified report of property.

If a person does not file a report required by section 38-13-401 or the administrator believes that a person may have filed an inaccurate, incomplete, or false report, the administrator may require the person to file a verified report in a form prescribed by the administrator. The report must:

State whether the person is holding property reportable under this article 13;

Describe property not previously reported or about which the administrator has inquired;

Specifically identify property described under subsection (1)(b) of this section about which there is a dispute whether it is reportable under this article 13; and

State the amount or value of the property.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 445, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1002.
Examination of records to determine compliance.

The administrator, at reasonable times and on reasonable notice, may:

Examine the records of a person, including examination of appropriate records in the possession of an agent of the person under examination, if such records are reasonably necessary to determine whether the person has complied with this article 13;

Issue an administrative subpoena requiring the person or an agent of the person to make records available for examination; and

Bring an action seeking judicial enforcement of the subpoena.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 445, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1003.
Rules for conducting examination.

The administrator shall adopt rules governing procedures and standards for an examination under section 38-13-1002, including rules for use of an estimation, extrapolation, and statistical sampling in conducting an examination.

An examination under section 38-13-1002 must be performed under rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section and with generally accepted examination practices and standards applicable to an unclaimed-property examination.

If a person subject to examination under section 38-13-1002 has filed the reports required by sections 38-13-401 and 38-13-1001 and has retained the records required by section 38-13-404, the following rules apply:

The examination must include a review of the person’s records;

The examination must not be based on an estimate unless the person expressly consents in a record to the use of an estimate; and

The person conducting the examination shall consider the evidence presented in good faith by the person in preparing the findings of the examination under section 38-13-1007.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 445, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1004.
Records obtained in examination.

Records obtained and records, including work papers, compiled by the administrator in the course of conducting an examination under section 38-13-1002:

Are subject to the confidentiality and security provisions of part 14 of this article 13 and are not public records;

May be used by the administrator in an action to collect property or otherwise enforce this article 13;

May be used in a joint examination conducted with another state, the United States, a foreign country or subordinate unit of a foreign country, or any other governmental entity if the governmental entity conducting the examination is legally bound to maintain the confidentiality and security of information obtained from a person subject to examination in a manner substantially equivalent to part 14 of this article 13;

Must be disclosed, on request, to the person that administers the unclaimed property law of another state for that state’s use in circumstances equivalent to circumstances described in this part 10, if the other state is required to maintain the confidentiality and security of information obtained in a manner substantially equivalent to part 14 of this article 13;

Shall be produced by the administrator under an administrative or judicial subpoena or administrative or court order; and

Shall be produced by the administrator on request of the person subject to the examination in an administrative or judicial proceeding relating to the property.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 446, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1005.
Evidence of unpaid debt or undischarged obligation.

A record of a putative holder showing an unpaid debt or undischarged obligation is prima facie evidence of the debt or obligation.

A putative holder may establish by a preponderance of the evidence that there is no unpaid debt or undischarged obligation for a debt or obligation described in subsection (1) of this section or that the debt or obligation was not, or no longer is, a fixed and certain obligation of the putative holder.

A putative holder may overcome prima facie evidence under subsection (1) of this section by establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that a check, draft, or similar instrument was:

Issued as an unaccepted offer in settlement of an unliquidated amount;

Issued but later was replaced with another instrument because the earlier instrument was lost or contained an error that was corrected;

Issued to a party affiliated with the issuer;

Paid, satisfied, or discharged;

Issued in error;

Issued without consideration;

Issued but there was a failure of consideration;

Voided not later than ninety days after issuance for a valid business reason set forth in a contemporaneous record; or

Issued but not delivered to the third-party payee for a sufficient reason recorded within a reasonable time after issuance.

In asserting a defense under this section, a putative holder may present evidence of a course of dealing between the putative holder and the apparent owner or of custom and practice.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 446, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1006.
Failure of person examined to retain records.

If a person subject to examination under section 38-13-1002 does not retain the records required by section 38-13-404, the administrator may determine the value of property due using a reasonable method of estimation based on all information available to the administrator, including extrapolation and use of statistical sampling when appropriate and necessary, consistent with examination procedures and standards adopted under section 38-13-1003 (1) and in accordance with section 38-13-1003 (2).

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 447, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1007.
Report to person whose records were examined.

At the conclusion of an examination under section 38-13-1002, the administrator shall provide to the person whose records were examined a complete and unredacted examination report that specifies:

The work performed;

The property types reviewed;

The methodology of any estimation technique, extrapolation, or statistical sampling used in conducting the examination;

Each calculation showing the value of property determined to be due; and

The findings of the person conducting the examination.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 447, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1008.
Complaint to administrator about conduct of person conducting examination.

If a person subject to examination under section 38-13-1002 believes the person conducting the examination has made an unreasonable or unauthorized request or is not proceeding expeditiously to complete the examination, the person in a record may ask the administrator to intervene and take appropriate remedial action, including countermanding the request of the person conducting the examination, imposing a time limit for completion of the examination, or reassigning the examination to another person.

If a person in a record requests a conference with the administrator to present matters that are the basis of a request under subsection (1) of this section, the administrator shall hold the conference not later than thirty days after receiving the request. The administrator may hold the conference in person, by telephone, or by electronic means.

If a conference is held under subsection (2) of this section, not later than thirty days after the conference ends, the administrator shall provide a report in a record of the conference to the person that requested the conference.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 448, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1009.
Administrator’s contract with another to conduct examination - definition.

In this section, “related to the administrator” refers to an individual who is:

The administrator’s spouse, partner in a civil union, domestic partner, or reciprocal beneficiary;

The administrator’s child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, sibling, stepsibling, half-sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, or nephew;

A spouse, partner in a civil union, domestic partner, or reciprocal beneficiary of an individual listed in subsection (1)(b) of this section; or

Any individual residing in the administrator’s household.

The administrator may contract with a person to conduct an examination under this part 10. The contract may be awarded only under the “Procurement Code”, articles 101 to 112 of title 24.

If the person with which the administrator contracts under subsection (2) of this section is:

An individual, the individual must not be related to the administrator; or

A business entity, the entity must not be owned in whole or in part by the administrator or an individual related to the administrator.

At least sixty days before assigning a person under contract with the administrator under subsection (2) of this section to conduct an examination, the administrator shall demand in a record that the person to be examined submit a report and deliver property that is previously unreported.

If the administrator contracts with a person under subsection (2) of this section:

The contract may provide for compensation of the person based on a fixed fee, hourly fee, or contingent fee;

A contingent fee arrangement must include a provision that:

Requires the person under contract with the administrator, upon completion of the examination, to provide the administrator with a statement of the amount of the contingent fee, the hours spent on the examination, and the average hourly rate for services provided by the person based on the contingent fee; and

Specifies an alternative hourly rate, not to exceed five hundred dollars per hour, at which the person under contract with the administrator is compensated in the event that the statement provided by the person under subsection (5)(b)(I) of this section indicates an average hourly rate for the examination of more than five hundred dollars per hour;

A contingent fee arrangement must not provide for a payment that exceeds twelve percent of the amount or value of property paid or delivered as a result of the examination; and

On request by a person subject to examination by a contractor, the administrator shall deliver to the person a complete and unredacted copy of the contract and any contract between the contractor and a person employed or engaged by the contractor to conduct the examination.

A contract under subsection (2) of this section is subject to public disclosure without redaction under the “Colorado Open Records Act”, part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 448, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1010.
Limit on future employment.

The administrator or an individual employed by the administrator who participates in, recommends, or approves the award of a contract under section 38-13-1009 (2) on or after July 1, 2020, must not be employed by, contracted with, or compensated in any capacity by the contractor or an affiliate of the contractor for two years after the latest of participation in, recommendation of, or approval of the award or conclusion of the contract.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 449, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1011.
Determination of liability for unreported reportable property.

If the administrator determines from an examination conducted under section 38-13-1002 that a putative holder has failed or refused to pay or deliver property to the administrator that is reportable under this article 13, the administrator shall issue a determination of the putative holder’s liability to pay or deliver and provide to the putative holder notice in a record of the determination.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 450, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.